trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="CM_RIURE">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riure</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riure</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rient</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rient</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rigu</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ric</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rius</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riu</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riuen</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rei</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ii1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rèi</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riur</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riguí</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riguer</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pp1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rigué</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riguér</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rigu</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ps_or"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rigu</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rigué</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_és"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rigue</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_es"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riur</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riu</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rigui</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riguem</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieu</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riguin</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riu</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rigui</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riguem</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieu</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riguin</l>
          <r>riure<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>som</i>
        <par n="CM_RIURE"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="CM_RIURE"/>
      </e>
